Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4379.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7yy. For taxes levied after December 31, 2025, property owned and occupied as a principal residence by a senior citizen is exempt from the collection of taxes under this act. Property owned and occupied as a principal residence by a senior citizen exempt under this section is subject to the specific tax levied under the senior citizens principal residence specific tax act. As used in this section, "principal residence" and "senior citizen" mean those terms as defined in the senior citizens principal residence specific tax act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4372 (request no. H01186'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.